src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON TJUOHTECASE !incoming from TJUOHTE
              :e%>Q1 TJUODE- ; !tjuohte-
              :i%>Q1 TJUODI- ; !tjuohti-
       +Sg+Ill:á%>j  K       ;
          +Ess:e%>n  K       ;
       +Sg+Nom:e%>   K       ;
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:ti%>  K       ;

LEXICON TJUODE-
   +Cmp/SgGen:  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Acc:v K                ;
      +Sg+Gen:  K                ;
      +Sg+Ine:n K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:s K                ;
      +Sg+Par:t K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:  K                ;

 +Sg+Ill+Attr:  K                ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:n K                ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:t K                ;


LEXICON TJUODI-
      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;

      +Pl+Gen:j   K ;
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;
      +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;
      +Pl+Ela:js  K ;
      +Pl+Com:j   K ;

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-TJUOHTECASE
 +Use/NG:e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-TJUODE- ;

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-TJUODE-
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Gen:  K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;

LEXICON TUVSÁN !incoming from justtuvsán
   +Cmp/SgGen:%>a    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;

      +Sg+Nom:%>     K                ;
      +Sg+Gen:%>a    K                ;
      +Sg+Acc:%>av   K                ;
      +Sg+Ill:%>ij   K                ;
      +Sg+Ine:%>in   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:%>is   K                ;
      +Sg+Par:%>it   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:%>ijn  K                ;

 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>a    K                ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:%>in   K                ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:%>it   K                ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:%>ijn  K                ;

         +Ess:%>in   K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:%>a    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:%>ij   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:%>ijt  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:%>ijn  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:%>ijs  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:%>ij   K                ;

LEXICON PL-TUVSÁN !incoming from MORETUVSÁN
    +Ess:%>in   K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>a    K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij   K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijt  K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>ijn  K ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijs  K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>ij   K ;

LEXICON WG-LÅK-TUVSÁN
     +Sg+Gen:%>a   K                ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:%>a   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !changed from sg+attr to sg+gen
     +Sg+Acc:%>av  K                ;
     +Sg+Ill:%>ij  K                ;
     +Sg+Ine:%>in  K                ;
     +Sg+Ela:%>is  K                ;
!    +Sg+Com:%>ijn K                ;
!       +Ess:%>in  K                ;

LEXICON WG-TUVSÁN
    +Sg+Gen:%>a  K                ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !changed from sg+attr to sg+gen
    +Sg+Acc:%>av K                ;
    +Sg+Ill:%>ij K                ;
    +Sg+Ine:%>in K                ;

! compounding and derivations

LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ! arabic as first part,
                     +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-              NAMÁKCont ; ! 10-jienat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
                                                               ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
                                                               ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
                     +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-»»#           SASJCont  ; !6-jahkásaš
          +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#jahkásasj+A:-»»#jahkásadtj ÅLLAGASJ  ; !
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#jahkásasj+A+Err/Orth:-»»#jahkasadtj ÅLLAGASJ  ; !
                                   :               RHyph     ; ! 3-


LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS  ! numeral as first part
         NAMÁK   ; ! tuvsánajienak, lågegielak, etc.
         SASJ    ;
 +Cmp#:# NUM2ADJ ;
      :  RHyph   ; ! 3-

LEXICON SASJ ! Second compounds. From numerals
 +Cmp#: SASJCont ;


LEXICON NUM2ADJ
  tjuohte+Num:#»tjuohtásadtj DER-SASJ   ;
  tjuohte+Num:#»tjuodag9     DER-AGAdj  ; !from OK
  tjuohte+Num:#»tjuoedeg9    DER-AGAdj  ; !from Kintel

!                            NounSecond ; ! golmmačiegahas
!   geardásaš:geardás        DABALAS    ;
! !tuvsán#geardásaš
!    jahkásaš:jahkás         DABALAS    ;


! Ordinal numbers
! ---------------


LEXICON VUOSTASJ
    +Sg+Nom:%>     K ;
    +Sg+Gen:%>a    K ;
    +Sg+Acc:%>av   K ;
    +Sg+Ill:%>ij   K ;
    +Sg+Ine:%>in   K ;
    +Sg+Ela:%>is   K ;
    +Sg+Com:%>ijn  K ;
       +Ess:%>in   K ;
    +Pl+Nom:%>a    K ;
    +Pl+Gen:%>ij   K ;
    +Pl+Acc:%>ijt  K ;
    +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;
    +Pl+Ine:%>ijn  K ;
    +Pl+Ela:%>ijs  K ;
    +Pl+Com:%>ij   K ;
      +Attr:%>     K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:       R ;

LEXICON TUVSÁNAT
 +Sg+Nom:t%>      K ;
 +Sg+Gen:tta%>    K ;
 +Sg+Acc:tta%>v   K ;
 +Sg+Ill:dda%>j   K ;
 +Sg+Ine:tta%>n   K ;
 +Sg+Ela:tta%>s   K ;
 +Sg+Com:tta%>jn  K ;
    +Ess:dda%>n   K ;
 +Pl+Nom:tta%>    K ;
 +Pl+Gen:tta%>j   K ;
 +Pl+Acc:tta%>jt  K ;
 +Pl+Ill:tta%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:tta%>jn  K ;
 +Pl+Ela:tta%>js  K ;
 +Pl+Com:tta%>j   K ;
   +Attr:t%>      K ;

! Collection numbers
! ---------------

LEXICON GUOVTES
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:á%>     K-VOW  ;
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:á%>v    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:á%>j    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:á%>n    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:á%>s    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:á%>jn   K-CONS ;
    +Ess+Sem/Hum:á%>n    K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Nom+Sem/Hum:á%>     K-VOW  ;
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:á%>j    K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:á%>jt   K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:á%>jda  K-VOW  ;
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:á%>jn   K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:á%>js   K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:á%>j    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Nom+Sem/Hum:á%>     PxV    ;
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:á%>     PxV    ;
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:á%>     PxV    ;
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:á%>s    PxCi   ;
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:á%>n    PxC    ;
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:á%>st   PxC    ;
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:á%>jn   PxC    ;
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:á%>j    PxC    ;
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:á%>jd   PxC    ;
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:á%>jdis PxC    ;
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:á%>jn   PxC    ;
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:á%>jst  PxC    ;
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:á%>j    PxC    ;


LEXICON VIDÁS
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>a     K-VOW  ;
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>av    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ij    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>in    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>is    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ijn   K-CONS ;
    +Ess+Sem/Hum:%>in    K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Nom+Sem/Hum:%>a     K-VOW  ;
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>ij    K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>ijt   K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ijda  K-VOW  ;
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>ijn   K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>ijs   K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ij    K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Nom+Sem/Hum:%>      PxC    ;
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>      PxC    ;
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>      PxC    ;
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>as    PxCs   ;
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>in    PxCs   ;
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>ist   PxCs   ;
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ijn   PxCs   ;
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>ij    PxCs   ;
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>ijd   PxCs   ;
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ijdas PxC    ;
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>ijn   PxCs   ;
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>ijst  PxCs   ;
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ij    PxCs   ;


LEXICON VIDÁSLÅGENAN
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>a#lågenan%>    K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>av#lågenan%>   K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ij#lågenan%>   K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>in#lågenan%>   K ;
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>is#lågenan%>   K ;
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ijn#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Sg+Par+Sem/Hum:%>it#lågenan%>   K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Sem/Hum:%>a#lågenan%>    K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>ij#lågenan%>   K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>ijt#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ijda#lågenan%> K ;
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>ijn#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>ijs#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ij#lågenan%>   K ;

LEXICON TJUODAGIS
 +Sg+Nom:%>      K        ;
 +Sg+Ill:sa%>j   K        ;
 +Sg+Gen:á%>     K        ;
 +Sg+Acc:á%>v    K        ;
 +Sg+Ine:á%>n    K        ;
 +Sg+Ela:á%>s    K        ;
 +Pl+Nom:á%>     K        ;
 +Pl+Gen:á%>j    K        ;
 +Pl+Acc:á%>jt   K        ;
 +Pl+Ill:á%>jda  K        ;
 +Pl+Ine:á%>jn   K        ;
 +Pl+Ela:á%>js   K        ;
 +Pl+Com:á%>j    K        ;
 +Sg+Com:á%>jn   K        ;
 +Sg+Nom:á%>     PxV      ;
 +Sg+Ill:sa%>s   PxCi     ;
 +Sg+Gen:á%>     PxV      ;
 +Sg+Acc:á%>     PxV      ;
 +Sg+Ine:á%>n    PxC      ;
 +Sg+Ela:á%>st   PxC      ;
 +Pl+Nom:á%>     PxNomPlV ;
 +Pl+Gen:á%>j    PxC      ;
 +Pl+Acc:á%>jd   PxC      ;
 +Pl+Ill:á%>jdis PxCs     ;
 +Pl+Ine:á%>jn   PxC      ;
 +Pl+Ela:á%>jst  PxC      ;
 +Pl+Com:á%>j    PxC      ;
 +Sg+Com:á%>jn   PxC      ;
