src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LÅGENAN
lågenannælját+v1+A+Ord:lågenan#næljád9 VUOSTASJ ;
lågenangávtsát+v1+A+Ord:lågenan#gávtsád9 VUOSTASJ ;
lågenanguovtes+v1+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#guoktás VIDÁS ;
lågenanguovtes+v2+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#guokt GUOVTES ;
lågenangålmås+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#gålmmås VIDÁS ;
lågenannieljes+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#nælljás VIDÁS ;
lågenanvidás+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#vihttas VIDÁS ;
lågenangudás+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#guhttas VIDÁS ;
lågenangietjas+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#giehtjas VIDÁS ;
lågenangávtses+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#gáktsás VIDÁS ;
lågenanavtses+v1+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:lågenan#aktsás VIDÁS ;  		 
lågenannuppát+v3+A+Ord+Use/-Spell:nuppát#lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ; !old
lågenangudát+v3+A+Ord+Use/-Spell:gudát#lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ; !old
lågenanguovtes+v3+N+Coll+Use/-Spell:guoktás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;   !old
lågenangålmås+v3+N+Coll+Use/-Spell:gålmmås VIDÁSLÅGENAN ; !old
lågenannieljes+v3+N+Coll+Use/-Spell:nælljás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;       !old
lågenanvidás+v3+N+Coll+Use/-Spell:vihttas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;   !old
lågenangudás+v3+N+Coll+Use/-Spell:guhttas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;   !old
lågenangietjas+v3+N+Coll+Use/-Spell:giehtjas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;  !old
lågenangávtses+v3+N+Coll+Use/-Spell:gáktsás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ; !old
lågenanavtses+v3+N+Coll+Use/-Spell:aktsás# VIDÁSLÅGENAN ; !old
LEXICON COLLECTIVE    !Some collective numbers that do not fit in anywhere else
gålmmågis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gålmmågis TJUODAGIS ;
nieljagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:nieljagis TJUODAGIS ;
guhttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:guhttagis TJUODAGIS ;
gietjagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gietjagis TJUODAGIS ;
gáktsegis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gáktsegis TJUODAGIS ;
låhkegis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:låhkegis TJUODAGIS ;
guoktalåkvihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:guokta#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
guoktalåkvihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:guok#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
nielljalåkvihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:niellja#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
vihttalåkvihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:vihtta#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
giehtjalåkvihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gietjav#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
gáktsalåkvihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gáktsa#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
guoktalågevihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:guokte#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
nielljalågevihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:niellje#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
giehtjalågevihttagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:giehtja#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;
avtatjuodagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:avta#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;
gudátjuodagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gudá#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;
gallagis+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gallagis TJUODAGIS ;
neljuk+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:neljug9 VUOSTASJ ;
nieljelågåk+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:nielje#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
gávtselågåk+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gávtse#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
guovtetjuodak+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:guovte#tjuodag9 VUOSTASJ ;
gudátjuodak+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gudá#tjuodag9 VUOSTASJ ;
tjuohtevidálågåk+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
guoktatjuotvidálågåk+Num:guokta#tjuot#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
guoktatjuohtevidálågåk+Num:guokte#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
nielljatjuotvidálågåk+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:niellje#tjuot#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
guhttatjuodevidálågåk+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:guhtta#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
giehtjatjuodevidálågåk+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:gietja#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
aktsetjuodevidálågåk+N+Coll+Sem/Hum:aktse#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
bielnup+A+Ord+Attr:biel#nup%># SASJ ;
biellenup+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#nup%># SASJ ;
biellegoalmát+Num:bielle#goalmád9 VUOSTASJ ;
biellevidát+Num:bielle#vidád9 VUOSTASJ ;
bielleavtsát+Num:bielle#avtsád9 VUOSTASJ ;
bielgoalmát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#goalmád9%> SASJ ;
bielnælját+A+Ord+Attr:biel#næljád9%> SASJ ;
bielvidát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#vidád9%> SASJ ;
bielgudát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#gudád9%> SASJ ;
bielgiehttjit+A+Ord+Attr:biel#giehttjid9%> SASJ ;
bielgávtsát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#gávtsád9%> SASJ ;
bielavtsát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#avtsád9%> SASJ ;
biellågåt+A+Ord+Attr:biel#lågåd9%> SASJ ;
biellegoalmát+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#goalmád9%> SASJ ;
biellenælját+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#næljád9%> SASJ ;
biellevidát+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#vidád9%> SASJ ;
biellegudát+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#gudád9%> SASJ ;
biellegiehttjit+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#giehttjid9%> SASJ ;
biellegávtsát+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#gávtsád9%> SASJ ;
bielleavtsát+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#avtsád9%> SASJ ;
biellelågåt+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#lågåd9%> SASJ ;
